District of Columbia statutes.
1-308.10

Prior legislation.

This part shall not adversely affect any actions taken, agreements entered into, pledge of security made, or Bonds issued prior to April 5, 2005.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-293, § 11, 52 DCR 1465